sv: Certifiering av idrottsstyrande organ: FIBA-godkänd; FIFA Quality Pro; IAAF-certifierad; IHSA-godkänd; ITF-godkänd; NCAA-godkänd; NFHS-godkänd; NOCSAE-certifierad; USSSA-godkänd; World Rugby-godkänd; Övrigt
ko: 스포츠 관리 기관 인증: FIBA 승인; FIFA 퀄리티 프로; IAAF 인증; IHSA 승인; ITF 승인; NCAA 승인; NFHS 승인; NOCSAE 인증; USSSA 승인; 월드 럭비 승인; 기타
en: Sports governing body certification: FIBA Approved; FIFA Quality Pro; IAAF Certified; IHSA Approved; ITF Approved; NCAA Approved; NFHS Approved; NOCSAE Certified; USSSA Approved; World Rugby Approved; Other
tr: Spor yönetim organı sertifikası: FIBA onaylı; FIFA Quality Pro; IAAF sertifikalı; IHSA onaylı; ITF onaylı; NCAA onaylı; NFHS onaylı; NOCSAE sertifikalı; USSSA onaylı; World Rugby onaylı; Diğer
ja: スポーツ統括団体認証: FIBA公認; FIFA Quality Pro; IAAF認証; IHSA公認; ITF公認; NCAA公認; NFHS公認; NOCSAE認証; USSSA公認; World Rugby公認; その他
ro-RO: Certificarea organismului de conducere sportiv: Aprobat de FIBA; FIFA Quality Pro; Certificat IAAF; Aprobat de IHSA; Aprobat de ITF; Aprobat de NCAA; Aprobat de NFHS; Certificat NOCSAE; Aprobat de USSSA; Aprobat de World Rugby; Altele
da: Certificering fra sportsforbund: FIBA-godkendt; FIFA Quality Pro; IAAF-certificeret; IHSA-godkendt; ITF-godkendt; NCAA-godkendt; NFHS-godkendt; NOCSAE-certificeret; USSSA-godkendt; World Rugby-godkendt; Andet
pt-PT: Certificação do organismo regulador desportivo: Aprovado pela FIBA; FIFA Quality Pro; Certificado pela IAAF; Aprovado pela IHSA; Aprovado pela ITF; Aprovado pela NCAA; Aprovado pela NFHS; Certificado pela NOCSAE; Aprovado pela USSSA; Aprovado pela World Rugby; Outro
fr: Certification d’une instance sportive: Approuvé par la FIBA; FIFA Quality Pro; Certifié par l’IAAF; Approuvé par l’IHSA; Approuvé par l’ITF; Approuvé par la NCAA; Approuvé par la NFHS; Certifié par le NOCSAE; Approuvé par l’USSSA; Approuvé par World Rugby; Autre
pt-BR: Certificação do órgão regulador esportivo: Aprovado pela FIBA; FIFA Quality Pro; Certificado pela IAAF; Aprovado pela IHSA; Aprovado pela ITF; Aprovado pela NCAA; Aprovado pela NFHS; Certificado pela NOCSAE; Aprovado pela USSSA; Aprovado pela World Rugby; Outro
nb: Sertifisering fra idrettsstyrende organer: FIBA-godkjent; FIFA Quality Pro; IAAF-sertifisert; IHSA-godkjent; ITF-godkjent; NCAA-godkjent; NFHS-godkjent; NOCSAE-sertifisert; USSSA-godkjent; World Rugby-godkjent; Annet
lt-LT: Sporto valdymo institucijos sertifikavimas: Patvirtinta FIBA; „FIFA Quality Pro“; Sertifikuota IAAF; Patvirtinta IHSA; Patvirtinta ITF; Patvirtinta NCAA; Patvirtinta NFHS; Sertifikuota NOCSAE; Patvirtinta USSSA; Patvirtinta „World Rugby“; Kita
de: Zertifizierung durch Sportverbände: FIBA Approved; FIFA Quality Pro; IAAF-zertifiziert; IHSA-zugelassen; ITF-zugelassen; NCAA-zugelassen; NFHS-zugelassen; NOCSAE-zertifiziert; USSSA-zugelassen; Von World Rugby zugelassen; Sonstige
sl-SI: Certifikat športne krovne organizacije: Odobrila FIBA; FIFA Quality Pro; Certificirala IAAF; Odobrila IHSA; Odobrila ITF; Odobrila NCAA; Odobrila NFHS; Certificirala NOCSAE; Odobrila USSSA; Odobril World Rugby; Drugo
it: Certificazione dell'ente sportivo governativo: Approvato FIBA; FIFA Quality Pro; Certificato IAAF; Approvato IHSA; Approvato ITF; Approvato NCAA; Approvato NFHS; Certificato NOCSAE; Approvato USSSA; Approvato World Rugby; Altro
el: Πιστοποίηση από αθλητικό διοικητικό φορέα: Εγκεκριμένο από τη FIBA; FIFA Quality Pro; Πιστοποιημένο από την IAAF; Εγκεκριμένο από την IHSA; Εγκεκριμένο από την ITF; Εγκεκριμένο από τo NCAA; Εγκεκριμένο από την NFHS; Πιστοποιημένο από τη NOCSAE; Εγκεκριμένο από την USSSA; Εγκεκριμένο από το World Rugby; Άλλο
hu: Sportszövetségi tanúsítvány: FIBA által jóváhagyott; FIFA Quality Pro; IAAF minősítésű; IHSA által jóváhagyott; ITF által jóváhagyott; NCAA által jóváhagyott; NFHS által jóváhagyott; NOCSAE minősítésű; USSSA által jóváhagyott; World Rugby által jóváhagyott; Egyéb
zh-TW: 體育管理機構認證: FIBA 認證; FIFA Quality Pro 認證; IAAF 認證; IHSA 認證; ITF 認證; NCAA 認證; NFHS 認證; NOCSAE 認證; USSSA 認證; 世界橄欖球總會 (World Rugby) 認證; 其他
es: Certificación del organismo rector del deporte: Aprobado por la FIBA; FIFA Quality Pro; Certificado por la IAAF; Aprobado por la IHSA; Aprobado por la ITF; Aprobado por la NCAA; Aprobado por la NFHS; Certificado por NOCSAE; Aprobado por la USSSA; Aprobado por World Rugby; Otro
th: การรับรองจากหน่วยงานกำกับดูแลกีฬา: ผ่านการรับรองโดย FIBA; ผ่านการรับรอง FIFA Quality Pro; ผ่านการรับรองโดย IAAF; ผ่านการรับรองโดย IHSA; ผ่านการรับรองโดย ITF; ผ่านการรับรองโดย NCAA; ผ่านการรับรองโดย NFHS; ผ่านการรับรองโดย NOCSAE; ผ่านการรับรองโดย USSSA; ผ่านการรับรองโดย World Rugby; อื่นๆ
cs: Certifikace sportovních řídících orgánů: Schváleno FIBA; FIFA Quality Pro; Certifikace IAAF; Schváleno IHSA; Schváleno ITF; Schváleno NCAA; Schváleno NFHS; Certifikace NOCSAE; Schváleno USSSA; Schváleno World Rugby; Jiné
bg-BG: Сертификация от спортна организация: Одобрено от FIBA; FIFA Quality Pro; Сертифицирано от IAAF; Одобрено от IHSA; Одобрено от ITF; Одобрено от NCAA; Одобрено от NFHS; Сертифицирано от NOCSAE; Одобрено от USSSA; Одобрено от World Rugby; Друго
pl: Certyfikacja organów zarządzających sportem: Zatwierdzone przez FIBA; FIFA Quality Pro; Certyfikat IAAF; Zatwierdzone przez IHSA; Zatwierdzone przez ITF; Zatwierdzone przez NCAA; Zatwierdzone przez NFHS; Certyfikat NOCSAE; Zatwierdzone przez USSSA; Zatwierdzone przez World Rugby; Inne
hr-HR: Certifikacija sportskog upravnog tijela: Odobrila FIBA; FIFA Quality Pro; Certificirao IAAF; Odobrila IHSA; Odobrio ITF; Odobrio NCAA; Odobrio NFHS; Certificirao NOCSAE; Odobrila USSSA; Odobrio World Rugby; Ostalo
sk-SK: Certifikácia športovej riadiacej organizácie: Schválené FIBA; FIFA Quality Pro; Certifikované IAAF; Schválené IHSA; Schválené ITF; Schválené NCAA; Schválené NFHS; Certifikované NOCSAE; Schválené USSSA; Schválené World Rugby; Iné
fi: Urheilun hallintoelimen sertifiointi: FIBA-hyväksytty; FIFA Quality Pro; IAAF-sertifioitu; IHSA-hyväksytty; ITF-hyväksytty; NCAA-hyväksytty; NFHS-hyväksytty; NOCSAE-sertifioitu; USSSA-hyväksytty; World Rugby -hyväksytty; Muu
zh-CN: 体育管理机构认证: FIBA 认证; FIFA 职业级认证; IAAF 认证; IHSA 认证; ITF 认证; NCAA 认证; NFHS 认证; NOCSAE 认证; USSSA 认证; World Rugby 认证; 其他
nl: Sport overkoepelende organisatie certificering: FIBA-goedgekeurd; FIFA Quality Pro; IAAF-gecertificeerd; IHSA-goedgekeurd; ITF-goedgekeurd; NCAA-goedgekeurd; NFHS-goedgekeurd; NOCSAE-gecertificeerd; USSSA-goedgekeurd; World Rugby-goedgekeurd; Overige
ru: Сертификация спортивного руководящего органа: Одобрено FIBA; FIFA Quality Pro; Сертифицировано IAAF; Одобрено IHSA; Одобрено ITF; Одобрено NCAA; Одобрено NFHS; Сертифицировано NOCSAE; Одобрено USSSA; Одобрено World Rugby; Другое
vi: Chứng nhận của cơ quan quản lý thể thao: Được FIBA phê chuẩn; FIFA Quality Pro; Được IAAF chứng nhận; Được IHSA phê chuẩn; Được ITF phê chuẩn; Được NCAA phê chuẩn; Được NFHS phê chuẩn; Được NOCSAE chứng nhận; Được USSSA phê chuẩn; Được World Rugby phê chuẩn; Khác